Nebraska, session 109, LB290.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-12,241, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,241 (1) A primary responsibility of the Economic Recovery and
Incentives Division of the Department of Economic Development shall be to
utilize federal or state funding to award grants as provided in this section.
For grants awarded under this section, the division shall pay a grantee an
advance of fifty percent of the total grant awarded with the remaining grant
funds paid on a monthly basis until the grant is paid in full or by December
31, 2026, whichever occurs sooner. The division may (a) require a grantee to
return unused grant funds upon a documented finding that such funds are not
being used for the purpose for which the grant was awarded or (b) reduce any
future monthly payments by the amount of such unused funds already paid.
(2) The division shall direct and prioritize the use of grants awarded
under this section toward the economic recovery of those communities and
neighborhoods within qualified census tracts or economic redevelopment areas
located within the boundaries of a city of the metropolitan class that were
disproportionately impacted by the COVID-19 public health emergency and related
challenges, with an emphasis on housing needs, assistance for small businesses,
job training, and business development within such communities and
neighborhoods. In prioritizing the use of grants awarded within the boundaries
of a city of the metropolitan class, the Economic Recovery and Incentives
Division shall rely on any studies produced pursuant to section 81-12,242.
(3)(a) The Economic Recovery and Incentives Division shall create a
Qualified Census Tract Recovery Grant Program to provide funding to public and
private entities located within qualified census tracts throughout the state to
respond to the negative impact of the COVID-19 public health emergency.
(b) Not to exceed ten million dollars in grants shall be distributed under
the grant program to eligible grantees in qualified census tracts that are
located in a city of the primary class.
(c) Not to exceed ten million dollars in grants shall be distributed under
the grant program to eligible grantees in qualified census tracts that are
located outside of a city of the metropolitan class or a city of the primary
class.
(d)(i) All remaining funds shall be allocated for grants distributed under
the grant program to eligible grantees in qualified census tracts that are
located in a city of the metropolitan class.
(ii) Any funds not applied for within such areas may be allocated for
grants to eligible grantees in any qualified census tract in such city.
(4) In addition to grants under the Qualified Census Tract Recovery Grant
Program, the Economic Recovery and Incentives Division shall provide grant
funding for the following purposes:
(a) Not to exceed ninety million dollars in grants to a nonprofit economic
development organization for the development of a business park located within
or adjacent to one or more qualified census tracts located within the
boundaries of a city of the metropolitan class and within the boundaries of an
inland port district located within a city of the metropolitan class. Grant
funds shall not be used in the downtown area or northern downtown area of a
city of the metropolitan class two miles of a major airport as defined in
section 13-3303. An innovation hub as defined in section 81-12,108 shall not
qualify for a grant under this subdivision. Before the release of such grant
funds, the division shall:
(i) Require each recipient of a grant under this subdivision (a) to attend
all meetings of the community advisory committee created pursuant to section
13-3306.01;
(ii) Require each grant recipient to establish a distinct bank account
exclusively for the management of grant funds received under this subdivision
(a). All proceeds from the lease, sale, or purchase of any real property in the
business park by any grant recipient shall only be used for the business park
for a minimum of fifteen years after receipt of the grant funding; and
(iii) Not release any funds other than the planning grant to any recipient
of a grant under this subdivision (a) until the following occurs:
(A) The division receives from the grantee a ten-year financial pro forma
and the grantee completes due diligence on such ten-year financial pro forma;
(B) The grantee holds two public input meetings to receive public input
regarding concerns, ideas, and priorities for economic development initiatives
within the business park. Such public input meetings shall provide a platform
-1-

LB290 LB290
2025 2025
for dialogue and collaboration between residents, the developer, local
government officials, and other stakeholders; and
(C) A letter of support is received from the inland port authority
managing the inland port district in which such business park is located;
(b) Not to exceed six million dollars in grants to a nonprofit
organization partnering with a city of the metropolitan class for the purpose
of providing internships and crime prevention within qualified census tracts
located within the boundaries of such city;
(c) Not to exceed five million dollars in grants pursuant to the purposes
of the Nebraska Film Office Fund on or before June 30, 2023, for the purpose of
producing a film on Chief Standing Bear, a portion of which is to be filmed in
one or more qualified census tracts located within the boundaries of a city of
the metropolitan class;
(d) Not to exceed twenty million dollars in grants to public or private
entities to prepare land parcels for affordable housing or conduct other
eligible affordable housing interventions under the federal American Rescue
Plan Act of 2021 including production, rehabilitation, and preservation of
affordable rental housing and affordable homeownership units within qualified
census tracts which are located in a city of the metropolitan class;
(e) Not to exceed twenty million dollars in grants to public or private
entities to prepare land parcels for affordable housing or conduct other
eligible affordable housing interventions under the federal American Rescue
Plan Act of 2021 including production, rehabilitation, and preservation of
affordable rental housing and affordable homeownership units within qualified
census tracts which are located in a city of the primary class;
(f) Not to exceed five million dollars in grants to a county agricultural
society with facilities within a city of the primary class to recoup lost
revenue; and
(g) Not to exceed one million dollars in grants to a postsecondary
institution located in a qualified census tract in a city of the metropolitan
class to provide funding for a financial literacy program to improve economic
and health outcomes for individuals residing in qualified census tracts.
(5) For purposes of subdivisions (4)(d) and (e) of this section, preparing
land parcels shall include:
(a) Costs and fees associated with legal land surveys and structural
assessments;
(b) Laying drinking water mains, lines, pipes, or channels;
(c) Development of access to essential utilities, such as sanitary sewer,
electric, gas, and high-speed Internet;
(d) Rehabilitation, renovation, maintenance, or other costs to secure
vacant or abandoned properties in disproportionately impacted communities;
(e) Acquiring and securing legal title of vacant or abandoned properties
in disproportionately impacted communities;
(f) Testing, removal, and remediation of environmental contaminants or
hazards from vacant or abandoned properties in disproportionately impacted
communities when conducted in compliance with applicable environmental laws or
regulations;
(g) Demolition or deconstruction of vacant or abandoned buildings in
disproportionately impacted communities; and
(h) Costs associated with inspection fees and other administrative costs
incurred to ensure compliance with applicable environmental laws and
regulations for demolition or other remediation activities in
disproportionately impacted communities.
(6) All grants made by the Economic Recovery and Incentives Division
utilizing federal funds allocated to the State of Nebraska from the federal
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund under the federal American Rescue Plan
Act of 2021 shall meet the eligible uses under such act and any relevant
guidance on the use of such funds by the United States Department of the
Treasury.
(7) All grants made by the Economic Recovery and Incentives Division
utilizing state funds to carry out subsection (2) of section 81-1239 are
subject to the intent and basic parameters of the federal American Rescue Plan
Act of 2021 but are not subject to meet the time restraints for allocation and
spending of funds or the federal reporting requirements indicated in the
federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-12,241, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
-2-